Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.160

Licenses—Who shall sign.

All licenses issued by the secretary on behalf of the commission shall be signed by the secretary or chairperson and secretary of the commission.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 215; 1991 c 3 s 65; 1989 c 202 s 21; 1951 c 130 s 3; 1935 c 112 s 17; RRS s 10031-17.]